Nevada, session 83, SB104.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Other State Education Programs Account in the
State General Fund for the cost of creating and maintaining
programs for school gardens that meet the requirements of
subsection 3 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $200,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $200,000
2. The Department of Education shall allocate the money
appropriated by subsection 1 to nonprofit organizations to provide at
a public school a program for a school garden which meets the
requirements set forth in subsection 3.
3. For a nonprofit organization to receive an allocation of
money to provide a program for a school garden pursuant to
subsection 2, the program must:
(a) Create and maintain a school garden at the school.
(b) Have a curriculum that:
(1) Includes a comprehensive science, technology,
engineering and mathematics school garden program. Such a
program must include, without limitation, a science, technology,
engineering and mathematics curriculum for outdoor or hydroponic
gardens for pupils in kindergarten through grade 12 that is tailored
to pupils of the appropriate grade levels at the school;
(2) Is written specifically for Nevada and the desert
environment of Nevada;
(3) Complies with the standards of content and performance
for a course of study in science adopted by the State Board of
Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(4) Uses experiential learning or project-based learning to
teach science, technology, engineering, arts and mathematics;
(5) Is designed with the assistance of teachers and other
educational personnel with experience at the appropriate grade
levels at the school; and
(6) Involves supervised learning experiences for the pupils at
the school in a classroom and a school garden.
(c) Provide the school with assistance from members of the
community, including, without limitation, trained educators, local
farmers and local chefs.
(d) Provide pupils with the:
(1) Ability to operate a farmer’s market to sell the produce
from the school garden; and
(2) Opportunity to have a local chef or employee of a school
who works in food services demonstrate how to cook a meal using
the produce grown from the school garden.
(e) Establish garden teams comprised of teachers and, if such
persons are available, parents and members of the community. Each
garden team shall meet at least once each month.
(f) Require any local nonprofit or community-based
organization which will provide services to implement the program
for a school garden to have at least 2 years of experience
implementing such a program.
4. Money allocated pursuant to subsection 2 may be used to:
(a) Provide professional development for teachers regarding the:
(1) Use of a school garden to teach pupils with disabilities,
including, without limitation, training for teaching such pupils
science, technology, engineering and mathematics curriculum and
vocational training to create a career path in horticulture;
(2) Development and implementation of science, technology,
engineering, arts and mathematics curricula that incorporate the use
of a school garden;
(3) Development and implementation of training that may be
provided to a group or individually to teachers in how to establish
and maintain school gardens to increase the time teachers allocate to
teaching science, technology, engineering and mathematics; and
(4) Development and implementation of a food safety plan
designed to ensure that food grown in a school garden is properly
handled and safe to sell and consume;
(b) Pay for any travel expenses associated with the attendance of
a teacher at any training or conference relating to school gardens;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) Pay for the costs of a conference regarding school gardens
held in this State.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
(b) “School garden” includes, without limitation, a hydroponic
garden.
Sec. 2. Upon acceptance of the money allocated pursuant to
section 1 of this act, a nonprofit organization agrees to:
1. Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before October 1, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money allocated pursuant to section 1 of
this act from the date on which the money was received by the
nonprofit organization through June 30, 2026;
2. Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before October 1, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money allocated pursuant to section 1 of
this act from the date on which the money was received by the
nonprofit organization through June 30, 2027; and
3. Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the nonprofit organization, regardless of their form or
location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an
audit of the use of the money allocated pursuant to section 1 of this
act.
Sec. 3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by section 1 of
this act remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Mob Museum the sum of $250,000 for the
planning phase of its expansion.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the National Council of Juvenile and Family Court
Judges the sum of $100,000 for the purpose of supporting the
Nevada Judicial Resource Center on Firearms.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Raise the Future the sum of $250,000 to support its
programs in this State.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)